Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [245.4908] HIGH-FIDELITY WRAPAROUND GRANTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of human services must establish a high-fidelity wraparound grant program to provide a comprehensive, holistic, child-and-family-driven response to children experiencing serious mental health or behavioral challenges. Grants must meet targeted case management services standards and support the delivery of high-fidelity wraparound services within an evidence-based model approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligible recipients. new text end new text begin A grantee must have a commitment to provide high-fidelity wraparound services and must be a county or a community-based service provider. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Allowable uses. new text end new text begin Grant money may be used for start-up costs, for ancillary care, and, when other payors are not available, as funding. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Technical assistance to counties. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must provide information to county human services directors about the grants under this section, including information on applying for an enhanced rate for children's mental health targeted case management. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must provide direction and support for interested counties to obtain the enhanced rate for children's mental health targeted case management. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Data collection and outcome measurement. new text end new text begin (a) Grantees must provide service utilization and outcome data to the commissioner of human services at least annually but no more than twice per calendar year. new text end new text begin (b) Grantees must provide a report to the commissioner by December 31 of each year that describes the grantee's efforts to leverage an enhanced targeted case management rate to support base funding for high-fidelity wraparound services for clients who are eligible for medical assistance. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HIGH-FIDELITY WRAPAROUND GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for the high-fidelity wraparound grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4908. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES TO INCARCERATED YOUTH.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of corrections for grants to juvenile detention centers to provide mental health services for incarcerated youth. The Department of Corrections, in collaboration with the Minnesota Juvenile Detention Association, must establish a formula to disburse funding equitably statewide. Money may be used to hire mental health professionals or contract for children's mental health services to provide mental health treatment in juvenile detention centers. new text end